Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-5,109
Debt collection agency; interest, fees, monetary penalties; prohibited, when.

(1) For purposes of this section, debt collection agency means any person or entity that collects or attempts to collect, directly or indirectly, debts due or asserted to be owed or due to another. Debt collection agency does not include the Department of Revenue or any programs administered by the department or a school, school district, school board, or board of education.

(2) No school board or board of education of a school district shall:

(a) Use a debt collection agency to collect or attempt to collect, directly or indirectly, debts due or assessed to be owed for outstanding debts on a school lunch or breakfast account of a student at such school district; or

(b) Assess or collect any interest, fees, or other monetary penalties for outstanding debts on a school lunch or breakfast account of a student at such school district.

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 91.
July 19, 2024